inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niwanishin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: giwanishin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: niwanishinimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: giwanishinimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: giwanishinim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: wanishin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: wanishinoog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: wanishinoon
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [wanishinoon,wanishinoo']
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: wanishinim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [niwanishinziin,niwanishinzii]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [giwanishinziin,giwanishinzii]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: niwanishinziimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: giwanishinziimin
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: giwanishinziim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [wanishinziin,wanishinzii]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: wanishinziiwag
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: wanishinziiwan
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [wanishinziiwan,wanishinziiwa']
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: wanishinziim
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: niwanishininaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: giwanishininaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: niwanishiniminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: giwanishiniminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: giwanishinimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinooban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [wanishinoobaniig,wanishinoobaneg ]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [wanishinoobaniin,wanishinoobanen]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [wanishinoobaniin,wanishinoobanen]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: wanishinimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: niwanishinziinaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: giwanishinziinaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: niwanishinziiminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: giwanishinziiminaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: giwanishinziimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinziiban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [wanishinziibaniig,wanishinziibaneg]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [wanishinziibaniin,wanishinziibanen]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [wanishinziibaniin,wanishinziibanen]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: wanishinziimwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: niwanishininaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: giwanishininaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: niwanishiniminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: giwanishiniminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: giwanishinimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: [wanishinowidog,wanishinodog]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: [wanishinowidogenag,wanishinodogenag]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: [wanishinowidogenan,wanishinodogenan]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [wanishinowidogenan,wanishinodogenan]
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: wanishinimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: niwanishinziinaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: giwanishinziinaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: niwanishinziiminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: giwanishinziiminaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: giwanishinziimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: wanishinziidog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: wanishinziidogenag
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: wanishinziidogenan
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [wanishinziidogenan,wanishinziidogena']
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: wanishinziimwaadog
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinogoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: wanishinogwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: wanishininigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: wanishinziigoban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: wanishinziigwaaban
     wanishin+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: wanishinziinigoban
